th: คุณลักษณะด้านการหมุนและการจัดวางตำแหน่งของขาจับฉาบ: การปรับหมุนแขน; ข้อต่อลูกหมาก; การปรับมุมบูม; บูมซ่อนได้; รองรับเมมโมรี่ล็อก; รวมเมมโมรี่ล็อก; ข้อต่อแบบหลายมุม/ทุกทิศทาง; ตัวปรับองศาแบบปลดไว; เมาท์ฉาบแบบไร้น็อตปีกผีเสื้อ; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Funcții de rotație/poziționare a brațului cinelului: Ajustarea rotației brațului; Articulație sferică; Ajustarea unghiului brațului boom; Braț boom retractabil; Compatibil cu blocare cu memorie; Blocare cu memorie inclusă; Articulație cu unghiuri multiple/omnidirecțională; Sistem de înclinare cu eliberare rapidă; Sistem de prindere a cinelului fără piuliță fluture; Altele
de: Rotations-/Positionierungsfunktionen des Beckenarms: Arm-Rotationsanpassung; Kugelgelenk; Galgenwinkel-Einstellung; Versenkbarer Galgen; Kompatibel mit Memory-Lock; Inklusive Memory-Lock; Multi-Winkel-/Omni-Winkel-Gelenk; Schnellverschluss-Neiger; Flügelmutterlose Beckenhalterung; Sonstige
sl-SI: Funkcije vrtenja/postavljanja stojala za činele: Prilagoditev vrtenja roke; Kroglični zglob; Prilagoditev kota roke (boom); Skrita roka (hideaway boom); Združljivo s spominsko ključavnico (memory lock); Priložena spominska ključavnica (memory lock); Večkotni zglob (omni-angle); Nagibni mehanizem za hitro sprostitev; Nosilec za činele brez krilne matice; Drugo
it: Funzioni di rotazione/posizionamento del braccio del piatto: Regolazione rotazione braccio; Giunto sferico; Regolazione inclinazione braccio a giraffa; Braccio a giraffa a scomparsa; Compatibile con blocco di memoria; Blocco di memoria incluso; Giunto multi-angolo/omni-angolo; Inclinatore a sgancio rapido; Supporto per piatto senza farfalla; Altro
fi: Symbaalivarren kierto- ja asemointiominaisuudet: Varren kierron säätö; Pallonivel; Puomin kulman säätö; Piilotettava puomi; Yhteensopiva muistilukon kanssa; Sisältää muistilukon; Monikulma-/yleisnivel; Pikavapautettava kallistusmekanismi; Siipimutteriton symbaalikiinnike; Muu
da: Funktioner til rotation og placering af bækkenarmen: Justering af armrotation; Kugleled; Justering af galgevinkel; Hideaway-galge; Kompatibel med memory lock; Memory lock medfølger; Multi-vinkel/omni-vinkel-led; Quick-release-tilter; Bækkenmontering uden vingemøtrik; Andet
es: Características de rotación/posicionamiento del brazo del platillo: Ajuste de rotación del brazo; Rótula; Ajuste del ángulo del brazo; Brazo retráctil; Compatible con bloqueo de memoria; Incluye bloqueo de memoria; Articulación multiángulo/omniángulo; Inclinador de liberación rápida; Montaje de platillo sin tuerca de mariposa; Otro
nb: Funksjoner for rotasjon/posisjonering av cymbalarmen: Justering av armrotasjon; Kuleledd; Justering av galgevinkel; Skjult galge; Kompatibel med minnelås; Minnelås inkludert; Fler-/omnivinkelledd; Hurtigkobling for tilt; Cymbalfeste uten vingemutter; Annet
hr-HR: Značajke rotacije/pozicioniranja ručice činele: Prilagodba rotacije ruke; Kuglični zglob; Prilagodba kuta „pecaljke”; Sklopiva ruka („pecaljka”); Kompatibilno s memorijskom bravom; Uključena memorijska brava; Zglob za više kutova / sve kutove; Zglob za brzi nagib; Nosač činele bez leptir matice; Ostalo
el: Χαρακτηριστικά περιστροφής/τοποθέτησης βραχίονα κυμβάλου: Ρύθμιση περιστροφής βραχίονα; Σφαιρικός σύνδεσμος; Ρύθμιση γωνίας βραχίονα (boom); Κρυφός βραχίονας (boom); Συμβατότητα με κλείδωμα μνήμης (memory lock); Περιλαμβάνεται κλείδωμα μνήμης (memory lock); Άρθρωση πολλαπλών γωνιών (omni-angle); Μηχανισμός κλίσης γρήγορης απελευθέρωσης; Βάση πιατινιού χωρίς πεταλούδα; Άλλο
zh-TW: 鈸臂旋轉/定位功能: 支臂旋轉調整; 球接頭; 吊桿角度調整; 隱藏式吊桿; 相容於記憶鎖; 包含記憶鎖; 多角度/全方位關節; 快拆傾斜器; 無翼形螺帽鈸固定座; 其他
hu: Cintányérkar forgatási/pozicionálási jellemzői: Karforgatás beállítása; Gömbcsukló; Gém dőlésszögének beállítása; Becsúsztatható gém; Memóriabilinccsel kompatibilis; Memóriabilincs mellékelve; Többszögű/minden irányban állítható csukló; Gyorskioldós dőlésállító; Szárnyasanya nélküli cintányér rögzítés; Egyéb
nl: Bekkenarm rotatie-/positioneringskenmerken: Armrotatie-aanpassing; Kogelgewricht; Boom-hoekaanpassing; Inschuifbare hengel; Compatibel met memory-lock; Inclusief memory-lock; Multi-angle-/omni-angle-gewricht; Quick-release-tilter; Vleugelmoerloze bekkenhouder; Overig
lt-LT: Lėkštės laikiklio sukimo / pozicionavimo funkcijos: Peties sukimo reguliavimas; Šarnyrinė jungtis; Gervės kampo reguliavimas; Paslepiama gervė; Suderinama su atminties fiksatoriumi; Pridėtas atminties fiksatorius; Kelių kampų / visakryptė jungtis; Greito atleidimo pakreipėjas; Lėkštės laikiklis be sparnuotųjų veržlių; Kita
sv: Funktioner för rotation/positionering av cymbalarmen: Justering av armrotation; Kulled; Justering av bomvinkel; Infällbar bom; Kompatibel med minneslås; Minneslås ingår; Flervinklad/omnivinklad led; Snabbfäste (tilter); Cymbalfäste utan vingmutter; Annat
ru: Особенности регулировки и позиционирования держателя тарелки: Регулировка вращения штанги; Шаровой шарнир; Регулировка угла наклона стрелы; Прячущаяся стрела; Совместимо с замком памяти (memory lock); Замок памяти в комплекте; Всенаправленный/многоугловой шарнир; Быстросъемный наклонный механизм; Крепление тарелки без барашковой гайки; Другое
bg-BG: Функции за въртене/позициониране на рамото за чинел: Регулиране на ротацията на рамото; Сферична става; Регулиране на ъгъла на чупещото рамо; Прибиращо се чупещо рамо; Съвместимост с мемори клейма; Включена мемори клейма; Многоъгълна става; Накланящ механизъм за бързо освобождаване; Монтаж на чинел без крилчата гайка; Други
pl: Funkcje obrotu/pozycjonowania ramienia talerza: Regulacja obrotu ramienia; Przegub kulowy; Regulacja kąta nachylenia ramienia; Chowane ramię; Zgodne z memory lock; Memory lock w zestawie; Przegub wielokątowy / wszechkierunkowy; Mechanizm szybkiego zwalniania; Mocowanie talerza bez nakrętki motylkowej; Inne
pt-PT: Características de rotação/posicionamento do braço do prato: Ajuste de rotação do braço; Articulação esférica; Ajuste de ângulo da girafa; Girafa retrátil; Compatível com bloqueio de memória; Bloqueio de memória incluído; Articulação multiângulo/omniângulo; Inclinador de libertação rápida; Montagem de pratos sem porca de orelhas; Outra
sk-SK: Funkcie otáčania/polohovania ramena činelu: Nastavenie otáčania ramena; Guľový kĺb; Nastavenie uhla ramena; Zásuvné rameno; Kompatibilné s pamäťovým zámkom; S pamäťovým zámkom; Kĺb s viacerými uhlami/všesmerový kĺb; Rýchloupínací kĺb; Uchytenie činela bez krídlových matíc; Iné
vi: Tính năng xoay/định vị cần đỡ chũm chọe: Điều chỉnh xoay cần; Khớp cầu; Điều chỉnh góc cần vươn; Cần vươn ẩn; Tương thích khóa nhớ; Kèm khóa nhớ; Khớp đa góc/toàn góc; Bộ nghiêng tháo lắp nhanh; Ngàm gắn chũm chọe không đai ốc tai hồng; Khác
zh-CN: 镲片支架臂旋转/定位功能: 悬臂旋转调节; 球头万向节; 斜杆角度调节; 隐藏式斜杆; 兼容记忆锁; 含记忆锁; 多角度/全向接头; 快拆倾斜器; 无蝶形螺母镲片支架; 其他
ja: シンバルアームの回転／位置決め機能: アーム回転調整; ボールジョイント; ブーム角度調整; ハイダウェイブーム; メモリーロック対応; メモリーロック付属; マルチアングル / オムニアングルジョイント; クイックリリースティルター; ウィングナットレスシンバルマウント; その他
fr: Fonctionnalités de rotation et de positionnement du bras de cymbale: Ajustement de la rotation du bras; Joint à rotule; Ajustement de l’angle de la perche; Perche escamotable; Compatible avec une bague mémoire; Bague mémoire incluse; Joint multi-angle/omni-angle; Inclineur à dégagement rapide; Montage de cymbale sans écrou papillon; Autre
en: Cymbal arm rotation/positioning features: Arm rotation adjustment; Ball joint; Boom angle adjustment; Hideaway boom; Memory lock compatible; Memory lock included; Multi-angle/omni-angle joint; Quick-release tilter; Wingnutless cymbal mount; Other
cs: Funkce otáčení/polohování ramene činelu: Nastavení rotace ramene; Kulový kloub; Nastavení úhlu ramene; Zasouvací rameno; Kompatibilní s paměťovou objímkou; Včetně paměťové objímky; Víceúhlový / všesměrový kloub; Rychloupínací nakláněcí mechanismus; Úchyt činelu bez křídlové matice; Jiné
pt-BR: Recursos de rotação/posicionamento do braço do címbalo/prato: Ajuste de rotação do braço; Junta esférica; Ajuste do ângulo do braço girafa; Braço girafa retrátil; Compatível com trava de memória; Trava de memória incluída; Junta de múltiplos ângulos/onidirecional; Inclinador de liberação rápida; Suporte de prato sem porca borboleta; Outros
tr: Zil kolu rotasyon/konumlandırma özellikleri: Kol dönüş ayarı; Bilyalı mafsal; Bom açı ayarı; Gizlenebilir bom; Hafıza kilidi ile uyumlu; Hafıza kilidi dahil; Çok açılı/her yöne dönen mafsal; Hızlı açılan eğim mekanizması; Kelebek somunsuz zil bağlantısı; Diğer
ko: 심벌 암 회전 및 위치 조절 기능: 암 회전 조정; 볼 조인트; 붐 각도 조정; 하이드어웨이 붐; 메모리 잠금 호환; 메모리 잠금 포함; 다각도/전방위 각도 조인트; 퀵 릴리스 틸터; 윙너트 리스 심벌 마운트; 기타